California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 Penal Code, to allow adequate time for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to make appropriate parole arrangements upon release of the person, the person shall remain in physical custody for a period not to exceed 72 hours or until parole arrangements are made by the Sexually Violent Predator Parole Coordinator of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, whichever is sooner. To facilitate timely parole arrangements, notification to the Sexually Violent Predator Parole Coordinator of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation of the pending release shall be made by telephone or facsimile and, to the extent possible, notice of the possible release shall be made in advance of the proceeding or decision determining whether to release the person.

(g) The notice required by this section shall be made whether or
 not a request has been made pursuant to Section 6609.

(h) The time limits imposed by this section are not applicable when the release date of a sexually violent predator has been advanced by a judicial or administrative process or procedure that could not have reasonably been anticipated by the State Department of State Hospitals and where, as the result of the time adjustments, there is less than 30 days remaining on the commitment before the inmate’s release, but notice shall be given as soon as practicable.

(i) In the case of any subsequent community placement or change of community placement of a conditionally released sexually violent predator, notice required by this section shall be given under the same terms and standards as apply to the initial placement, except in the case of
 an emergency where the sexually violent predator must be moved to protect the public safety or the safety of the sexually violent predator. In the case of an emergency, the notice shall be given as soon as practicable, and the affected communities may comment on the placement as described in subdivision (b).

(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 816, Sec. 2.   (AB 1954)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6609.2.

(a) When any sheriff or chief of police is notified by the State Department of State Hospitals of its recommendation to the court concerning the disposition of a sexually violent predator pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 6609.1, that sheriff or chief of police may notify any person designated by the sheriff or chief of police as an appropriate recipient of the notice.

(b) A law enforcement official authorized to provide notice pursuant to this section, and the public agency or entity employing the law enforcement official, shall not be liable for providing or failing to provide notice pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 71.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6609.3.

(a) At the time a notice is sent pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6609.1, the sheriff, chief of police, or district attorney notified of the release shall also send a notice to persons described in Section 679.03 of the Penal Code who have requested a notice, informing those persons of the fact that the person who committed the sexually violent offense may be released together with information identifying the court that will consider the conditional release, recommendation regarding recommitment, or review of commitment status
 pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 6605. When a person is approved by the court to be conditionally released, notice of the community in which the person is scheduled to reside shall also be given only if it is (1) in the county of residence of a witness, victim, or family member of a victim who has requested notice, or (2) within 100 miles of the actual residence of a witness, victim, or family member of a victim who has requested notice. If, after providing the witness, victim, or next of kin with the notice, there is any change in the release date or the community in which the person is to reside, the sheriff, chief of police, or the district attorney shall provide the witness, victim, or next of kin with the revised information.

(b) At the time a notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6609.1 the Department of Corrections shall also send a notice to persons described in Section 679.03 of the Penal Code who have requested a
 notice informing those persons of the fact that the person who committed the sexually violent offense has been released.

(c) In order to be entitled to receive the notice set forth in this section, the requesting party shall keep the sheriff, chief of police, and district attorney who were notified under Section 679.03 of the Penal Code, informed of his or her current mailing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 961, Sec. 11.   Effective September 29, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Expense of Detention or Proceedings Concerning Commitments [6715. - 6717.]



  ARTICLE 4. Persons with Intellectual Disabilities [6715. - 6717.]

6715.

The court shall inquire into the financial condition of the parent, guardian, or other person charged with the support of a person committed as having an intellectual disability, and if it finds the person able to do so, in whole or in part, it shall make a further order, requiring him or her to pay, to the extent the court considers the person able, the expenses of the proceedings in connection with the investigation, detention, and commitment of the person committed, and the expenses of the committed person’s delivery to the institution, and to pay to the county, at stated periods, the sums the court deems proper, during the time the person remains in the institution or on leave of absence to a licensed hospital, facility, or home for the care of those persons. This
 order may be enforced by further orders as the court deems necessary, and may be varied, altered, or revoked in its discretion.

The court shall designate a county officer to keep a record of payments ordered to be made, to receive, receipt for, and record the payments made, to pay over the payments to the county treasurer, to see that the persons ordered to make the payments comply with the orders, and to report to the court any failure to make the payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 60.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6716.

In any case in which the probation officer is charged with the duty of collecting amounts payable to the county under this article, upon the verified application of the probation officer the board of supervisors may make an order discharging the probation officer from further accountability for the collection of any such amount in any case as to which the board determines that the amount is too small to justify the cost of collection; that the statute of limitations has run; or that the collection of such amount is improbable for any reason. Such order is authorization for the probation officer to close his books in regard to such item, but such discharge of accountability of the probation officer does not constitute a release of any person from liability for payment of any such amount which is due and owing to the county. The board may request a written opinion from the district attorney or county counsel as to whether any particular amount is too small to justify the cost of collection, whether the statute of limitations has run, or whether collection of any particular item is improbable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6717.

The cost necessarily incurred in determining whether a person is a fit subject for commitment and securing his or her commitment, is a charge upon the county where he or she is committed. These costs include the fees of witnesses, medical examiners, psychiatrists, and psychologists allowed by the judge ordering the examination. If the person sought to be committed is not an indigent person, the costs of the proceedings are the obligation of that person and shall be paid by him or her, or by his or her guardian or conservator, as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of the Probate Code, or shall be paid by persons legally liable for his or her maintenance, unless otherwise ordered by the judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 61.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Execution of Commitment Orders [6740. - 6751.]



  ARTICLE 4.  Persons with Intellectual Disabilities [6740. - 6741.]

6740.

The court shall attach to the order of commitment of a person with an intellectual disability its findings and conclusions, together with all the social and other data it has bearing upon the case, and the same shall be delivered to the place of commitment with the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 63.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6741.

The sheriff or probation officer, whichever is designated by the court, may execute the order of commitment with respect to a person with an intellectual disability.

In a case in which the probation officer executes the order of commitment, he or she shall be compensated for transporting the person to a state hospital in the amount and manner that a sheriff is compensated for similar services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 64.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Medical Examiners [6750. - 6751.]

6750.

The superior court judge of each county may grant certificates in accordance with the form prescribed by the State Department of State Hospitals, showing that the persons named therein are reputable physicians licensed in this state, and have been in active practice of their profession at least five years. When certified copies of such certificates have been filed with the department, it shall issue to such persons certificates or commissions, and the persons therein named shall be known as “medical examiners.” There shall at all times be at least two such medical examiners in each county. The certificate may be revoked by the department for incompetency or neglect, and shall not be again granted without the consent of the
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 148.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.

The department shall keep in its office a record showing the name, residence, and certificate of each duly qualified medical examiner. Immediately upon the receipt of each duly certified copy of a medical examiner’s certificate, it shall file the same, and advise him of its receipt and filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Counselors in Mental Health [6775. - 6779.]

6775.

The office of counselor in mental health may be created in any county in this state by the board of supervisors thereof. The counselors in mental health to serve under the provisions of this chapter shall be nominated and appointed by the judge of the superior court by written order entered in the minutes of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6776.

In each county where the office of counselor in mental health has been created under the provisions of this chapter, the judge of the superior court may appoint two such counselors. In Los Angeles County, the number, compensation, and benefits of counselors in mental health are governed by the Trial Court Employment Protection and Governance Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 71600) of Title 8 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 620.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6777.

The term of office of the counselors in mental health shall be during the pleasure of the court, and they may at any time be removed by the court in its discretion. Such counselors shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties of their office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6778.

The counselor in mental health may perform such services as are designated by the county. Every counselor, assistant counselor, and deputy counselor in mental health shall have the powers of a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

6779.

Wherever in this code or in any other statute reference is made to psychopathic probation officers, such reference shall be deemed to mean and refer to the counselors in mental health provided for in this chapter; and wherever in this code or in any other statute reference is made to probation of incompetent persons, such reference shall mean and refer to supervision of such persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Duties of Peace Officers [6800. - 6800.]

6800.

All peace officers and other persons having similar duties relating to judicially committed poor persons shall see that all poor and indigent committed persons within their respective municipalities are speedily granted the relief conferred by this part. When so ordered by a superior court judge, they shall see that such committed persons are, without unnecessary delay, transferred to the proper state hospitals provided for their care and treatment. Before sending a person to any such hospital, they shall see that he is in a state of bodily cleanliness and comfortably clothed with clean clothes. The department may by order direct that any person whom it deems unsuitable therefor shall not be employed as an attendant for any committed person. After the patient has been delivered to the proper officers of the hospital, the care and custody of the county or municipality from which he is sent ceases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Mentally Disordered Persons Charged With Crime [6825. - 6825.]

6825.

The procedures for handling persons with mental health disorders who are charged with the commission of public offenses are provided for in Section 1026 of the Penal Code and in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1365), Title 10, Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 112.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. MENTAL INSTITUTIONS [7100. - 7700.]



CHAPTER 1. County Psychiatric Hospitals [7100. - 7107.]

7100.

(a) The board of supervisors of each county may maintain in the county hospital or in any other hospital situated within or without the county or in any other psychiatric health facility situated within or without the county, suitable facilities and nonhospital or hospital service for the detention, supervision, care, and treatment of persons who have a mental health disorder or a developmental disability, or who are alleged to be such.

(b) The county may contract with public or private hospitals for those facilities and hospital service when they are not suitably available in an institution, psychiatric facility, or establishment maintained or operated by the county.

(c) The facilities and services for
 persons who have, or are alleged to have, a mental health disorder shall be subject to the approval of the State Department of Health Care Services, and the facilities and services for persons who have, or are alleged to have, a developmental disability shall be subject to the approval of the State Department of Developmental Services. The professional person having charge and control of the hospital or psychiatric health facility shall allow the department whose approval is required to make investigations thereof as it deems necessary at any time.

(d) Nothing in this chapter means that persons who have a mental health disorder or a developmental disability may not be detained, supervised, cared for, or treated, subject to the right of inquiry or investigation by the department, in their own homes, or the homes of their relatives or friends, or in a licensed establishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 113.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7101.

As used in this chapter “county psychiatric hospital” means the hospital, ward, or facility provided by the county pursuant to the provisions of Section 7100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7102.

The superintendent or person in charge of the county psychiatric hospital, may receive, detain, supervise, care for or treat in the hospital any person who comes within any of the following descriptions:

(a) Who has been placed therein pursuant to a court order or court commitment under the provisions of this code or the Penal Code.

(b) Who has been placed therein pursuant to the provisions of Part 1 of Division 5 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7103.

The superintendent or person in charge of the county psychiatric hospital may admit and provide care and treatment in the hospital for any person who comes within the following descriptions:

(a) Who voluntarily makes a written application as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Part 1 of Division 6 of this code.

(b) Who is a conservatee and has written application made in his behalf by his conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.

Any adult person detained in such hospital, who is in such condition of mind as to render him competent to make such application shall at his request be exempt from medical or psychiatric treatment, upon filing with the superintendent a statement that he depends upon prayer or spiritual means for healing in the practice of the religion of a well-recognized religious church, sect, denomination, or organization. In case of an adult not found to be in such condition of mind, a similar statement may be filed on his behalf by another and thereupon similar exemption shall be granted. Any minor detained in such hospital shall be exempt from medical or psychiatric treatment if his parent or guardian or conservator shall file with said superintendent an affidavit stating that he relies upon prayer or spiritual means for healing in the practice of the religion of a well-recognized religious church, sect, denomination or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

7105.

A superintendent or person in charge of the county psychiatric hospital may discharge any patient who is not a proper case for treatment therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7106.

In case a county psychiatric hospital patient or the person legally liable for his maintenance is or becomes the owner of property, real, personal, or mixed, the county furnishing such care, treatment, or observation, shall be reimbursed therefrom for its charges. The board of supervisors of the county shall fix and determine a schedule of charges for the care, treatment, or observation of such patients, and reimbursement to the county shall be made upon the basis of the charges so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7107.

Any superintendent or person in charge of the county psychiatric hospital, and any public officer, public employee, or public physician who either admits, causes to be admitted, delivers, or assists in delivering, detains, cares for, or treats, or assists in detaining, caring for or treating, any person pursuant to this chapter shall not be rendered criminally liable thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. State Hospitals for the Mentally Disordered [7200. - 7375.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment and General Government [7200. - 7207.]

7200.

There are in the state the following state hospitals for the care, treatment, and education of the mentally disordered:

(a) Metropolitan State Hospital near the City of Norwalk, Los Angeles County.

(b) Atascadero State Hospital near the City of Atascadero, San Luis Obispo County.

(c) Napa State Hospital near the City of Napa, Napa County.

(d) Patton State Hospital near the City of San Bernardino, San Bernardino County.

(e) Coalinga State Hospital near the City of Coalinga, Fresno County.

(f) Any other State Department of State Hospitals facility subject to available funding by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 718, Sec. 7.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7200.06.

(a) After construction of the perimeter security fence is completed at Napa State Hospital, no patient whose placement has been required pursuant to the Penal Code shall be placed outside the perimeter security fences, with the exception of placements in the general acute care and skilled nursing units. The State Department of State Hospitals shall ensure that appropriate security measures are in place for the general acute care and skilled nursing units.

(b) Any alteration to the security perimeter structure or policies shall be made in conjunction with representatives of the City of Napa, the County of Napa, and local law enforcement agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 53.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7200.5.

The children’s treatment center at Camarillo State Hospital shall be known as the Norbert I. Rieger Children’s Treatment Center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.

All of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals shall be governed by the uniform rules and regulations of the State Department of State Hospitals and all of the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 4100) of Division 4 of this code on the administration of state institutions serving persons with mental health disorders shall apply to the conduct and management of the state hospitals. All of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services shall be governed by the uniform rules and regulations of the State Department of Developmental Services and, except as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7500) of this division, all of the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 4440) of Division 4.1 of this code on the administration of state institutions
 serving persons with developmental disabilities shall apply to the conduct and management of the state hospitals for persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 115.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall regularly consult with the Napa State Hospital Task Force, which consists of local community representatives, on proposed policy or structural modifications to Napa State Hospital that may affect the Napa community, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Changes in the patient population mix.

(b) Construction of, or significant alterations to, facility structures.

(c) Changes in the hospital security plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 153.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7203.

The Director of General Services may grant to the San Bernardino Unified School District or to the County of San Bernardino under such terms, conditions, and restrictions as he deems to be for the best interests of the state, the necessary easements and rights-of-way over and across the Patton State Hospital property for all purposes of a public or private road. The right-of-way shall be across, along, and upon the following described property:

The westerly 33 feet of Lot 2 of Block 60 of Rancho San Bernardino as recorded in Book 7 of Maps, page 2, Records of San Bernardino County, State of California, saving and excepting the southerly 40 rods thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7204.

(a) Grounds privileges or passes may be earned by patients, whose placement has been required pursuant to the Penal Code, at all state hospitals. Grounds privileges shall be restricted to areas of the state hospital that are designated as secured campus areas.

(b) Off-ground privileges or passes shall not be granted to patients, whose placement has been required pursuant to the Penal Code, at state hospitals. When a patient whose placement has been required pursuant to the Penal Code leaves a state hospital for any purpose other than discharge, the patient shall be accompanied by staff at all times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 44.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7205.

The Director of General Services with the consent of the State Department of Developmental Services is hereby authorized to transfer to the City of Costa Mesa and to convey to said city all of the state’s rights, title and interest, and upon such terms and conditions and with such reservations and exceptions as in the opinion of the Director of General Services may be in the best interest of the state, and subject to such use or uses as may be agreed upon by the city and the State Department of Developmental Services with the approval of the Director of General Services, in all or any part of the real property consisting of approximately five acres lying at the southwest corner of the Fairview State Hospital property in Orange County, being a parcel of land lying within Lot A of the Banning Tract, in the Rancho Santiago de Santa Ana, City of Orange, State of California, as shown on a map of said tract filed in action No. 6385 in the Superior Court of the State of California in and for the City of Los Angeles, being an action for partition entitled Hancock Banning et al. vs. Mary H. Banning, more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at the most southeasterly corner of Parcel G as shown on a record of survey filed in Book 53, pages 34 through 36, of records of Surveys in the office of the County Recorder of Orange County, California; thence along the boundary of said Parcel G northwesterly along a curve concave southwesterly having a radius of 540.00 feet through a central angle of 23 degrees, 01 minutes, 33 seconds, an arc distance of 217.01 feet, thence north 34 degrees, 32 minutes, 30 seconds west, 97.50 feet to a point on a line parallel with and 280.00 feet measured at right angles northerly of the north line of Fairview Farms as shown on said record of Survey; thence departing from the boundary of said Parcel G north 89 degrees, 27 minutes, 30 seconds east along said parallel line 936.97 feet; thence south 0 degrees, 32 minutes, 30 seconds east, 280.00 feet to said north line of Fairview Farms; thence south 89 degrees, 27 minutes, 30 seconds, west, 800.00 feet to the point of beginning.

The conveyance of such property shall be subject to the following conditions: 

(a) There shall be excepted and reserved in the state all deposits of minerals, including oil and gas, in the property and to the state, or persons authorized by the state, the right to prospect for, mine, and remove such deposits from the property.

(b) If the city shall cease to use the property for public purposes, all right, title, and interest of the county in and to the property shall cease and the property shall revert and rest in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

7206.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4444, the Director of General Services, with the consent of the Director of State Hospitals, may grant a right-of-way for road purposes to the County of San Bernardino over and along a portion of the Patton State Hospital property adjacent to Arden Way and Pacific Street upon such terms and conditions and with such reservations and exceptions as in the opinion of the Director of General Services will be for the best interests of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 154.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7207.

The Director of General Services, with the consent of the State Department of State Hospitals, may grant to the Regents of the University of California, upon such terms, conditions, and with such reservations and exceptions as in the opinion of the Director of General Services may be for the best interest of the state, the necessary easements and rights-of-way for a utilities relocation and campus access road on the Langley Porter Neuropsychiatric Institute property. The right-of-way shall be across, along and upon the following described property:

A strip of land approximately 40´ in width extending from the southerly line of Parnassus Avenue beginning at a point on the southerly boundary of Parnassus Avenue 331´ from the
 westerly boundary of said parcel of land described by deed dated October 1, 1940, and extending in a southerly direction to the south boundary of Langley Porter property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 155.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Admission [7225. - 7234.]

7225.

Except as otherwise provided, all patients admitted to a state hospital shall be duly committed or transferred thereto, and shall be subject to the general rules and regulations of the department and of the hospital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7226.

The State Department of State Hospitals may admit to any state hospital, if there is room therein, any soldier or sailor in the service of the United States who has a mental health disorder on terms agreed upon between the department and the properly authorized agents, officers, or representatives of the United States government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 116.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7227.

Prisoners who have mental health disorders and who are in the state prisons shall be admitted to the state hospitals in accordance with the provisions of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 117.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7228.

Prior to admission, the State Department of State Hospitals shall evaluate each patient committed pursuant to Section 1026 or 1370 of the Penal Code to determine the placement of the patient to the appropriate State Department of State Hospitals facility, as defined in Section 4100. The State Department of State Hospitals shall utilize the documents provided pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1026 of the Penal Code and paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code to make the appropriate placement. A patient determined to be a high security risk shall be treated in the department’s most secure facilities pursuant to Section 7230. A Penal Code patient not needing this level of security shall be treated as near to the patient’s community as possible if an appropriate treatment program is
 available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 63.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7230.

Those patients determined to be high security risk patients, as described in Section 7228, shall be treated at Atascadero State Hospital or Patton State Hospital, a correctional facility, or other secure facility as defined by the State Department of State Hospitals, but shall not be treated at Metropolitan State Hospital or Napa State Hospital. Metropolitan State Hospital and Napa State Hospital shall treat only low- to moderate-risk patients, as defined by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 158.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7231.

(a) The State Department of Mental Health shall develop policies and procedures, by no later than 30 days following the effective date of the Budget Act of 1997, at each state hospital, to notify appropriate law enforcement agencies in the event of a patient escape or walkaway. Local law enforcement agencies, including local police and county sheriff departments, shall review the policies and procedures prior to final implementation by the department.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2012, the State Department of State Hospitals may adopt the policies and procedures developed by the State Department of Mental Health pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 159.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7232.

(a) The State Department of Mental Health shall issue a state hospital administrative directive by no later than 30 days following the effective date of the Budget Act of 1997 to require patients whose placement has been required pursuant to the Penal Code, and other patients within the secured perimeter at each state hospital, to wear clothing that enables these patients to be readily identified.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2012, the State Department of State Hospitals may adopt the state hospital administrative directive issued by the State Department of Mental Health pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 160.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7234.

(a) (1) A Patient Management Unit (PMU) shall be established within the State Department of State Hospitals to facilitate patient movement across all facilities under its jurisdiction, as defined in Section 4100, and any psychiatric programs operated by the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to a memorandum of understanding with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) The PMU’s responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to, oversight and centralized management of patient admissions, and collection of data for reports and patient population projections.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals shall adopt regulations, consistent with this article,
 concerning policies and procedures to be implemented by the PMU, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Policies and procedures for patient referral to the State Department of State Hospitals.

(2) Screening criteria that ensures that patients are placed in a State Department of State Hospitals facility or psychiatric program closest to their county of residence in the absence of a compelling reason to place the patient in another facility. Compelling reasons may include, but not be limited to, the patient’s specialized psychiatric, medical, or safety needs, and the availability of beds for his or her commitment type.

(c) The Director of State Hospitals may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section. The adoption of an emergency regulation under this paragraph is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the Director of State Hospitals is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 64.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Patients’ Care [7250. - 7254.]

7250.

Any person who has been committed is entitled to a writ of habeas corpus, upon a proper application made by the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, by that person, or by a relative or friend in his or her behalf to the judge of the superior court of the county in which the hospital is located, or if the person has been found incompetent to stand trial and has been committed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, judicial review shall be in the superior court for the county that determined the question of the mental competence of the person. All documents requested by the court in the county of confinement shall be forwarded from the county of commitment to the
 court. Upon the return of the writ, the truth of the allegations under which he or she was committed shall be inquired into and determined. The medical history of the person as it appears in the clinical records shall be given in evidence, and the superintendent in charge of the state hospital wherein the person is held in custody and any other person who has knowledge of the facts shall be sworn and shall testify relative to the mental condition of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 161.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7251.

Every executive director of a state hospital, shall, within three days after the reception of a patient, make or cause to be made a thorough physical and mental examination of the patient, and state the result thereof, on blanks prepared and exclusively set apart for that purpose. During the time the patient remains under his or her care he or she shall also make, or cause to be made, from time to time, examination of the mental state, bodily condition, and medical treatment of the patient at such intervals and in such manner, and state its result, upon blank forms, as are approved by the department. In the event of the death or discharge of a patient, the superintendent, or person in charge of the state hospital, shall state the circumstances thereof upon forms as are
 required by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 162.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7252.

Any patient in a state hospital, upon the consent of the executive director and medical director of the hospital, may voluntarily donate blood to any nonprofit blood bank duly licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 163.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7253.

Every patient in a state hospital under this chapter may be permitted to keep for his or her own use articles of handiwork and other finished products suitable primarily for personal use, as determined by the executive director, which have been fabricated by the patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 164.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7254.
